Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.100

Requiring payment by credit card prohibited.

It is a violation of this chapter for a commercial telephone solicitor to require that payment be by credit card authorization or otherwise to announce a preference for that method of payment over any other for unfair or deceptive reasons.

[ 1989 c 20 s 10.]